Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2203
Powers, benefits, and privileges.

Except as the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act shall otherwise
require, professional corporations shall enjoy all the powers, benefits, and
privileges and be subject to all the duties, restrictions, and liabilities
of a business corporation under the Nebraska
Model Business Corporation Act and sections 21-301 to 21-325.02.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 3, p. 556;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 208;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 270.
January 1, 2016
Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.